Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4401
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-4401 to 43-4407:

(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(2) Service area means a geographic area administered by the department and designated pursuant to section 81-3116.

Laws 2012, LB1160, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1173, § 11.